Idaho, session 2025, H0452.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support
Program's Division of the Idaho Digital Learning Academy an additional
$3,577,600 to be expended from the Public School Income Fund for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $3,577,600 from the General Fund to the Public School
Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of the
Idaho Digital Learning Academy, $3,577,600 shall be considered expended
from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding Section 33-907, Idaho Code, and any other
provision of law to the contrary, no moneys shall be withdrawn from the Pub-
lic Education Stabilization Fund for the Idaho Digital Learning Academy for
services provided during the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025. The
Idaho Digital Learning Academy shall rely on existing cash balances for any
costs associated with eligible enrollments above the appropriation.
SECTION 5. IDAHO DIGITAL LEARNING ACADEMY FUNDING PROCESS. The Second
Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature shall consider poli-


cies to verify funds provided by the state for match of individual student
enrollment, which may include changing how the state, districts, charters,
and public are billed for courses at the Idaho Digital Learning Academy
(IDLA). To assist the Legislature, IDLA shall provide a report to the Bud-
get and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office that
details the cost of providing each available service, how IDLA determined
the budgeted amount for each service or class, and a detailed report on
budgeted and expenditure data for costs associated with operating IDLA. Pro-
vided services shall include data on class type, grade level, number of and
type of courses enrolled in, and other defining factors. The report shall
be provided no later than August 1, 2025, based on data from the 2024-2025
school year. The format and content of the report will be determined in con-
sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 6. That Section 22 of House Bill No. 251, as enacted by the
First Regular Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the
same is hereby amended to read as follows:
SECTION 22. IDAHO DIGITAL LEARNING ACADEMY. The Idaho Digital
Learning Academy (IDLA), created pursuant to Chapter 55, Title 33,
Idaho Code, shall utilize state-appropriated funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, to achieve the following:
(1) Tuition charged by IDLA to Idaho school districts and char-
ter schools shall not exceed $75.00 $40.00 per enrollment.
(2) Provide remedial coursework for students failing to achieve
proficiency in one or more areas of Idaho's standards-based tests.
(3) Pursuant to State Board of Education rule, IDAPA 08.02.03,
provide advanced opportunities, including access to dual credit
courses, for students.
The preceding list shall not be construed as excluding other
instruction and training that may be provided by the Idaho Digital
Learning Academy.
SECTION 7. That Section 33-1020, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1020. IDAHO DIGITAL LEARNING ACADEMY FUNDING. (1) An amount of four
hundred thirty dollars ($430) four hundred forty-five dollars ($445) per en-
rollment shall be distributed to support the Idaho digital learning acad-
emy, created pursuant to chapter 55, title 33, Idaho Code. For the purposes
of this section, an "enrollment" shall be counted each time an Idaho school
age child enrolls in an Idaho digital learning academy class and continues
to be enrolled in such class past the deadline to withdraw, where such with-
drawal would not result in the class appearing on such child's transcript in
any way. A single child enrolled in multiple classes shall count as multiple
enrollments. Summer enrollments shall be included in the fiscal year that
begins that summer.
(2) The state department of education shall make an estimated distri-
bution of funds to the Idaho digital learning academy by no later than July


31 of each fiscal year, consisting of eighty percent (80%) of the estimated
funding for the fiscal year. The balance of all remaining funds to be dis-
tributed, pursuant to the calculations in this section, shall be distributed
by no later than May 15 of the same fiscal year. The state department of
education shall reconcile the enrollments prior to the May 15 payment and
withhold or recover any costs necessary to align the funding with verified
enrollments. The joint finance-appropriations committee shall consider
adjusting the per enrollment amount each legislative session by a percent-
age increase equal to the percentage increase approved for salary increases
for instructional and pupil service staff pursuant to section 33-1004B,
Idaho Code, and for administrative and classified staff pursuant to section
33-1004E, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.